Hawaii statutes.
§386-94 Attorneys, physicians, other health
care providers, and other fees. Claims for services shall not be valid
unless approved by the director or, if an appeal is had, by the appellate board
or court deciding the appeal. Any claim so approved shall be a lien upon the
compensation in the manner and to the extent fixed by the director, the
appellate board, or the court.

In approving fee requests, the director,
appeals board, or court may consider factors such as the attorney's skill and
experience in state workers' compensation matters, the amount of time and
effort required by the complexity of the case, the novelty and difficulty of
issues involved, the amount of fees awarded in similar cases, benefits obtained
for the claimant, and the hourly rate customarily awarded attorneys possessing
similar skills and experience. In all cases, reasonable attorney's fees shall
be awarded.

Any person who receives any fee, other
consideration, or gratuity on account of services so rendered, without
approval, in conformity with the preceding paragraph, shall be fined by the
director not more than $10,000. [L 1963, c 116, pt of §1; Supp, §97-103; HRS
§386-94; am L 1985, c 296, §6; am L 1988, c 37, §2; am L 1993, c 301, §1; am L
Sp 2005, c 11, §9]

Case Notes

The disability compensation division of the department of
labor and industrial relations must set forth its reasons for reducing an
attorney's fee request for appropriate appeals board and possible judicial
review of the reduction pursuant to §91-14; the format of an order reducing
attorney's fees and/or costs need only be sufficient to enable appropriate
review for abuse of discretion. 132 H. 320, 321 P.3d 671 (2014).

The intermediate court of appeals did not err in concluding
that the disability compensation division of the department of labor and
industrial relations was not required to hold a contested case hearing on
petitioner's request to reopen petitioner's attorney's fees and costs request.
132 H. 320, 321 P.3d 671 (2014).

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next